Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOIL HEALTH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for the soil health financial assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.134. The commissioner may award no more than $50,000 of the appropriation each year to a single recipient. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available in fiscal year 2027. Appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for soil health financial assistance grants are available until June 30, 2029. new text end